Missouri, session 2026, HB2285.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 290, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 290.116, to read as follows:
290.116. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Director", the director of the department of labor and industrial relations
or his or her authorized representative;
(2) "Employee", the same meaning given to such term under section 290.500;
(3) "Employer", an individual or private business entity that employs a
workforce at an establishment. For purposes of this section, "employer" also includes
any individual, partnership, association, corporation, or any person or group of persons
acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee and
includes any person who, directly or indirectly, owns and operates a nominal employer
or who owns a corporate subsidiary that, directly or indirectly, owns and operates a
nominal employer or makes the decision responsible for the employment action that
gives rise to a mass layoff subject to notification;
(4) "Establishment", a place of employment that has been operated by an
employer for a period longer than three years, provided that "establishment" shall not
include a temporary construction site. The term "establishment" may include a single
location or a group of locations, including any building located in this state;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2285 2
(5) "Mass layoff", a reduction in the size of a workforce that is not the result of a
transfer or termination of operations and that results in the termination of employment
at an establishment during any thirty-day period for fifty or more employees at or
reporting to the establishment;
(6) "Operating unit", an organizationally distinct product, operation, or specific
work function within or across facilities at a single establishment;
(7) "Termination of employment", the layoff of an employee without a
commitment to reinstate the employee to his or her previous employment within six
months of the layoff, except that "termination of employment" shall not mean a
voluntary departure or retirement of an employee, a discharge or suspension of an
employee for misconduct of the employee connected with the employment, or any layoff
of a seasonal employee. "Termination of employment" shall not refer to any situation in
which an employer offers to an employee, at a location in this state and no more than
fifty miles from the previous place of employment, the same employment or a position
with equivalent status, benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment. A
layoff of more than six months that, at its outset, was announced to be a layoff of six
months or less, shall not be considered a "termination of employment" if the extension
beyond six months is caused by business circumstances not reasonably foreseeable at the
time of the initial layoff and notice is given at the time it becomes reasonably foreseeable
that the extension beyond six months will be required;
(8) "Termination of operations", the permanent or temporary shutdown of a
single establishment or of one or more facilities or operating units within a single
establishment, except that "termination of operations" shall not include a termination
of operations made necessary because of a fire, flood, natural disaster, national
emergency, act of war, civil disorder, industrial sabotage, decertification from
participation in the Medicare and Medicaid programs as described under 42 U.S.C.
Section 1395 et seq., or any license revocation under the laws of this state;
(9) "Transfer of operations", the permanent or temporary transfer of a single
establishment, or one or more facilities or operating units within a single establishment,
to another location, inside or outside of this state.
2. If an establishment is subject to a transfer of operations or a termination of
operations that results, during any continuous period of no more than thirty days, in the
termination of employment of fifty or more employees, or if an employer conducts a
mass layoff, the employer who operates the establishment or conducts the mass layoff
shall:
(1) Provide, in the case of an employer who employs one hundred or more
employees, no less than ninety days or the period of time required under the federal

HB 2285 3
Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Section
2101 et seq., whichever is longer, before the first termination of employment occurs in
connection with the termination or transfer of operations or mass layoff, notification of
the termination or transfer of operations or mass layoff to the director, the chief elected
official of any municipality in which the establishment is located, each employee whose
employment is to be terminated, and any collective bargaining units of employees at the
establishment;
(2) Provide, to each employee whose employment is terminated, severance pay
equal to one week of pay for each full year of employment. If the employer provides any
employee with less than the number of days of notification required under subdivision
(1) of this subsection, the employer shall provide that employee with an additional four
weeks of pay. The rate of severance pay provided by the employer under this
subdivision shall be the average regular rate of compensation received during the
employee's last three years of employment with the employer or the final regular rate of
compensation paid to the employee, whichever rate is higher. Severance under this
subsection shall be regarded as compensation due to an employee for back pay and
losses associated with the termination of the employment relationship and earned in full
upon the termination of the employment relationship, notwithstanding the calculation of
the amount of the payment with reference to the employee’s length of service. An
employer shall provide an employee the greater of:
(a) The severance pay required under this subdivision; or
(b) Any severance pay provided by the employer pursuant to a collective
bargaining agreement or for any other reason.

Any back pay provided by the employer to the employee under the Worker Adjustment
and Retraining Notification Act, 29 U.S.C. Section 2101 et seq., because of a violation of
that act, shall be credited toward meeting the severance pay requirements of this
subdivision.
3. No waiver of the right to severance provided under this section shall be
effective without approval of the waiver by the director or by a court of competent
jurisdiction.
4. The department of labor and industrial relations may promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the

HB 2285 4
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
✔